Massachusetts, session 194th, S558.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall establish a pilot
program for research activities and demonstration projects for nature-based solutions, as defined
in section 1 of chapter 21N of the General Laws. The program shall: (i) define categories of
nature-based solutions and develop standards for their use; (ii) coordinate, streamline and
expedite the permitting and review process for activities and projects; and (iii) prioritize
activities and projects that advance scientific knowledge, provide conservation benefits, and
minimize impacts to existing wetlands. The secretary of energy and environmental affairs and
commissioners/directors of permitting agencies may modify specific performance standards for
nature-based solutions.
of 2

(b) The pilot program shall commence upon the effective date of this Act and operate for
5 years. Not later than one year from the effective date of this Act, and annually thereafter, the
secretary shall file a report with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and the joint
committee on environment and natural resources that: (i) details the categories of nature-based
solutions; (ii) analyzes the approval time for all permits required for each approved research
activity or demonstration project; (iii) specifies any specific performance standards modified for
each approved research activity or project; and (iv) provides data about the effectiveness of each
approved research activity or project.
of 2